Maine, session 132, LD2056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-A MRSA §3-308, sub-§1, as repealed and replaced by PL 1985, c. 113,
§2, is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
1. Except as provided in this section, a creditor may not contract for or receive
payments of principal and interest pursuant to a schedule of payments under which any one
payment is not substantially equal to all other payments, excluding:
A. A down payment receivable by the creditor;
B. A transaction pursuant to a schedule of payments under which the intervals between
any consecutive payments differ substantially; and
C. A simple interest transaction pursuant to a schedule of payments under which the
scheduled payments are not substantially equal but no payment is more than 50%
greater than any other payment;